Utah statutes.
38-1a-507.   Notice of completion.

(1) (a)  Upon final completion of a construction project, a notice of completion may be filed with the registry by:

(i)  an owner;

(ii)  an original contractor for construction work;

(iii)  a lender that has provided financing for the construction project;

(iv)  a surety that has provided bonding for the construction project; or

(v)  a title company issuing a title insurance policy on the construction project.

(b)  A notice of completion shall include:

(i)  the name, address, telephone number, and email address of the person filing the notice of completion;

(ii)  the name of the county in which the project property is located;

(iii)  for a private project:

(A)  the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in the project property;

(B)  the entry number of a preliminary notice on the same project that includes the tax parcel identification number of each parcel included in the project property; or

(C)  the entry number of the building permit issued for the project;

(iv)  for a government project, the government project-identifying information;

(v)  the date on which final completion is alleged to have occurred; and

(vi)  the method used to determine final completion.

(2)  A person filing a notice of completion by alternate means is responsible for verifying and changing any incorrect information in the notice of completion before the expiration of the time period during which the notice is required to be filed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 278, 2012 General Session

